Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-145
Agricultural experiment stations; acceptance of provisions of federal act.

Full and complete acceptance, ratification and assent is hereby made and given by the State of Nebraska to all of the provisions, terms, grants and conditions and purposes of the grants made and prescribed by the Act of Congress of the United States, entitled An act to establish agricultural experiment stations in connection with the colleges established in the several states under the provisions of an act approved July 2, 1862, and of the acts supplementary thereto.

Laws 1887, c. 88, § 1, p. 637;

R.S.1913, § 7131;

C.S.1922, § 6763;

C.S.1929, § 85-149;

R.S.1943, § 85-145.